Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-102.02
Universities; program responsibilities.

(1) The University of Nebraska-Lincoln shall have responsibility for operating comprehensive programs of undergraduate instruction and primary responsibility, except in the health-related disciplines, for operating comprehensive programs of graduate, postgraduate, and professional instruction, research, and public service as authorized by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska consistent with the role and mission assignments provided in Chapter 85, article 9.

(2) The University of Nebraska at Omaha shall have responsibility for operating general programs of undergraduate instruction and programs of graduate instruction, research, and public service as authorized by the Board of Regents consistent with the role and mission assignments provided in Chapter 85, article 9.

(3) The University of Nebraska at Kearney shall have responsibility for operating general programs of undergraduate instruction and programs of graduate instruction, research, and public service as authorized by the Board of Regents consistent with and limited by the role and mission assignments provided in Chapter 85, article 9.

(4) The University of Nebraska Medical Center shall have primary responsibility in the health-related disciplines for operating programs of undergraduate instruction and comprehensive programs of graduate, postgraduate, and professional instruction, research, and public service as authorized by the Board of Regents consistent with the role and mission assignments provided in Chapter 85, article 9.

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 19.